Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 3.1. Automobile Clubs.

§§ 13.1-400.1 through 13.1-400.10.

Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 250, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

13.1-400.1

through 13.1-400.10 relating to Automobile Clubs, were derived from Code 1950, §§ 46-546 through 46-553; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 55; 1958, c. 244; ; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1972, c. 684; 1981, c. 10; 1982, cc. 56, 63; 1992, c. 468; 1998, c. 16; 2001, c. 706; 2011, c. 298.